Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4714
Examination of organization.

(1) The director may make an examination of the affairs of any prepaid limited health service organization as often as is reasonably necessary for the protection of the interests of the people of this state but not less frequently than once every four years.

(2) Every prepaid limited health service organization shall make its relevant books and records available for such examination and in every way cooperate with the director to facilitate such examination.

(3) The expenses of examinations under this section shall be charged to the prepaid limited health service organization being examined, and the prepaid limited health service organization shall remit the charges to the director.

(4) In lieu of such examination, the director may accept the report of an examination made by the chief administrative officer of an insurance department of another state.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 14.